cs: Součásti sestavy displeje v balení: Kompletní montážní sada; LCD + digitizér; LCD + digitizér + zadní deska; LCD + digitizér + rám; LCD + digitizér + přední kamera; Pouze LCD; OLED + digitizér; Pouze OLED; Dotykové sklo + rám; Pouze dotykové sklo; Jiné
ro-RO: Componente ale ansamblului ecranului incluse: Kit de asamblare complet; LCD + digitizer; LCD + digitizer + placă spate; LCD + digitizer + cadru; LCD + digitizer + cameră frontală; Doar LCD; OLED + digitizer; Doar OLED; Sticlă touchscreen + cadru; Doar sticlă touchscreen; Altele
fr: Composants de l’assemblage de l’écran inclus: Kit d'assemblage complet; LCD + numériseur; LCD + numériseur + plaque arrière; LCD + numériseur + cadre; LCD + numériseur + caméra avant; LCD uniquement; OLED + numériseur; OLED uniquement; Vitre tactile + cadre; Vitre tactile uniquement; Autre
ru: Компоненты экранной сборки в комплекте: Полный комплект сборки; ЖК-дисплей + дигитайзер; ЖК-дисплей + дигитайзер + задняя пластина; ЖК-дисплей + дигитайзер + рамка; ЖК-дисплей + дигитайзер + фронтальная камера; Только ЖК-дисплей; OLED + дигитайзер; Только OLED; Сенсорное стекло + рамка; Только сенсорное стекло; Другой
da: Skærmsamlingskomponenter inkluderet: Komplet monteringssæt; LCD + digitizer; LCD + digitizer + bagplade; LCD + digitizer + ramme; LCD + digitizer + frontkamera; Kun LCD; OLED + digitizer; Kun OLED; Touchskærmglas + ramme; Kun touchskærmglas; Andet
sv: Skärmenhetens komponenter som ingår: Komplett monteringssats; LCD + digitizer; LCD + digitizer + bakplatta; LCD + digitizer + ram; LCD + digitizer + frontkamera; Endast LCD; OLED + digitizer; Endast OLED; Pekskärmsglas + ram; Endast pekskärmsglas; Övrigt
lt-LT: Ekrano mazgo pridėti komponentai: Pilnas surinkimo rinkinys; LCD + skaitmenizatorius; LCD + skaitmenizatorius + galinė plokštė; LCD + skaitmenizatorius + rėmas; LCD + skaitmenizatorius + priekinė kamera; Tik LCD; OLED + skaitmenizatorius; Tik OLED; Jutiklinio ekrano stiklas + rėmas; Tik jutiklinio ekrano stiklas; Kita
zh-TW: 包含的螢幕組裝元件: 完整組裝套件; LCD + 觸控板; LCD + 觸控板 + 背板; LCD + 觸控板 + 邊框; LCD + 觸控板 + 前置相機; 僅 LCD; OLED + 觸控板; 僅 OLED; 觸控玻璃 + 邊框; 僅觸控玻璃; 其他
tr: Dahil edilen ekran montaj bileşenleri: Tam montaj kiti; LCD + Dokunmatik panel; LCD + Dokunmatik panel + Arka plaka; LCD + Dokunmatik panel + Çerçeve; LCD + Dokunmatik panel + Ön kamera; Sadece LCD; OLED + Dokunmatik panel; Sadece OLED; Dokunmatik cam + Çerçeve; Sadece dokunmatik cam; Diğer
fi: Näyttökokoonpanoon sisältyvät komponentit: Täydellinen kokoonpanosarja; LCD + digitoija; LCD + digitoija + takalevy; LCD + digitoija + kehys; LCD + digitoija + etukamera; Vain LCD; OLED + digitoija; Vain OLED; Kosketusnäytön lasi + kehys; Vain kosketusnäytön lasi; Muu
hu: Kijelzőszerelvény mellékelt alkatrészei: Teljes összeszerelő készlet; LCD + digitalizáló; LCD + digitalizáló + hátlap; LCD + digitalizáló + keret; LCD + digitalizáló + előlapi kamera; Csak LCD; OLED + digitalizáló; Csak OLED; Érintőképernyő üveg + keret; Csak érintőképernyő üveg; Egyéb
it: Componenti dell'assemblaggio schermo inclusi: Kit di assemblaggio completo; LCD + digitalizzatore; LCD + digitalizzatore + piastra posteriore; LCD + digitalizzatore + telaio; LCD + digitalizzatore + fotocamera frontale; Solo LCD; OLED + digitalizzatore; Solo OLED; Vetro touchscreen + telaio; Solo vetro touchscreen; Altro
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดหน้าจอที่รวมอยู่: ชุดประกอบเต็ม; LCD + ดิจิไทเซอร์; LCD + ดิจิไทเซอร์ + แผ่นหลัง; LCD + ดิจิไทเซอร์ + กรอบ; LCD + ดิจิไทเซอร์ + กล้องหน้า; LCD เท่านั้น; OLED + ดิจิไทเซอร์; OLED เท่านั้น; กระจกทัชสกรีน + กรอบ; กระจกทัชสกรีนเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 包含的屏幕组件: 完整组装套件; LCD + 触控屏; LCD + 触控屏 + 背板; LCD + 触控屏 + 边框; LCD + 触控屏 + 前置摄像头; 仅 LCD; OLED + 触控屏; 仅 OLED; 触控玻璃 + 边框; 仅触控玻璃; 其他
de: Enthaltene Komponenten der Displayeinheit: Kompletter Montagesatz; LCD + Digitizer; LCD + Digitizer + Rückplatte; LCD + Digitizer + Rahmen; LCD + Digitizer + Frontkamera; Nur LCD; OLED + Digitizer; Nur OLED; Touchscreen-Glas + Rahmen; Nur Touchscreen-Glas; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Componentes do conjunto de tela incluídos: Kit de montagem completo; LCD + digitalizador; LCD + digitalizador + placa traseira; LCD + digitalizador + moldura; LCD + digitalizador + câmera frontal; Apenas LCD; OLED + digitalizador; Apenas OLED; Vidro touchscreen + moldura; Apenas vidro touchscreen; Outro
hr-HR: Uključene komponente sklopa zaslona: Potpuni montažni komplet; LCD + digitalizator; LCD + digitalizator + stražnja ploča; LCD + digitalizator + okvir; LCD + digitalizator + prednja kamera; Samo LCD; OLED + digitalizator; Samo OLED; Staklo zaslona osjetljivog na dodir + okvir; Samo staklo zaslona osjetljivog na dodir; Ostalo
ko: 스크린 어셈블리 포함 구성요소: 전체 조립 키트; LCD + 디지타이저; LCD + 디지타이저 + 백플레이트; LCD + 디지타이저 + 프레임; LCD + 디지타이저 + 전면 카메라; LCD만; OLED + 디지타이저; OLED만; 터치스크린 유리 + 프레임; 터치스크린 유리만; 기타
ja: スクリーンアセンブリに含まれる部品: フルアセンブリキット; LCD + デジタイザー; LCD + デジタイザー + バックプレート; LCD + デジタイザー + フレーム; LCD + デジタイザー + フロントカメラ; LCDのみ; OLED + デジタイザー; OLEDのみ; タッチスクリーンガラス + フレーム; タッチスクリーンガラスのみ; その他
sl-SI: Vključene komponente sestave zaslona: Komplet za celotno montažo; LCD + digitalizator; LCD + digitalizator + zadnja plošča; LCD + digitalizator + okvir; LCD + digitalizator + sprednja kamera; Samo LCD; OLED + digitalizator; Samo OLED; Steklo zaslona na dotik + okvir; Samo steklo zaslona na dotik; Drugo
pl: Elementy montażowe ekranu w zestawie: Pełny zestaw montażowy; LCD + digitizer; LCD + digitizer + płyta tylna; LCD + digitizer + rama; LCD + digitizer + kamera przednia; Tylko LCD; OLED + digitizer; Tylko OLED; Szkło dotykowe + rama; Tylko szkło dotykowe; Inne
en: Screen assembly components included: Full assembly kit; LCD + Digitizer; LCD + Digitizer + Back Plate; LCD + Digitizer + Frame; LCD + Digitizer + Front Camera; LCD only; OLED + Digitizer; OLED only; Touchscreen glass + Frame; Touchscreen glass only; Other
el: Συμπεριλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα συναρμολόγησης οθόνης: Πλήρες κιτ συναρμολόγησης; LCD + ψηφιοποιητής; LCD + ψηφιοποιητής + πίσω πλάκα; LCD + ψηφιοποιητής + πλαίσιο; LCD + ψηφιοποιητής + μπροστινή κάμερα; Μόνο LCD; OLED + ψηφιοποιητής; Μόνο OLED; Τζάμι οθόνης αφής + πλαίσιο; Μόνο τζάμι οθόνης αφής; Άλλο
bg-BG: Включени компоненти на екранния модул: Пълен комплект за сглобяване; LCD + дигитайзер; LCD + дигитайзер + задна плоча; LCD + дигитайзер + рамка; LCD + дигитайзер + предна камера; Само LCD; OLED + дигитайзер; Само OLED; Сензорно стъкло + рамка; Само сензорно стъкло; Други
nb: Skjermenhetens komponenter inkludert: Komplett monteringssett; LCD + digitizer; LCD + digitizer + bakplate; LCD + digitizer + ramme; LCD + digitizer + frontkamera; Kun LCD; OLED + digitizer; Kun OLED; Berøringsskjermglass + ramme; Kun berøringsskjermglass; Annet
sk-SK: Súčasti zostavy obrazovky v balení: Kompletná sada na montáž; LCD + digitalizér; LCD + digitalizér + zadná doska; LCD + digitalizér + rám; LCD + digitalizér + predná kamera; Iba LCD; OLED + digitalizér; Iba OLED; Dotykové sklo + rám; Iba dotykové sklo; Iné
pt-PT: Componentes do conjunto de ecrã incluídos: Kit de montagem completo; LCD + Digitalizador; LCD + Digitalizador + Placa traseira; LCD + Digitalizador + Moldura; LCD + Digitalizador + Câmara frontal; Apenas LCD; OLED + Digitalizador; Apenas OLED; Vidro tátil + Moldura; Apenas vidro tátil; Outro
vi: Linh kiện lắp ráp màn hình đi kèm: Bộ lắp ráp đầy đủ; LCD + Bộ số hóa; LCD + Bộ số hóa + Tấm lưng; LCD + Bộ số hóa + Khung; LCD + Bộ số hóa + Camera trước; Chỉ LCD; OLED + Bộ số hóa; Chỉ OLED; Kính cảm ứng + Khung; Chỉ kính cảm ứng; Khác
es: Componentes del ensamblaje de pantalla incluidos: Kit de ensamblaje completo; LCD + digitalizador; LCD + digitalizador + placa trasera; LCD + digitalizador + marco; LCD + digitalizador + cámara frontal; Solo LCD; OLED + digitalizador; Solo OLED; Cristal de pantalla táctil + marco; Solo cristal de pantalla táctil; Otros
nl: Meegeleverde schermassemblage-onderdelen: Volledige assemblage kit; LCD + digitizer; LCD + digitizer + achterplaat; LCD + digitizer + frame; LCD + digitizer + frontcamera; Alleen LCD; OLED + digitizer; Alleen OLED; Touchscreen glas + frame; Alleen touchscreen glas; Andere